src/de/tokenizer.xfst
source all/allpref.xfst

define Caseinsensitive [
a (->) A,
b (->) B,
c (->) C,
d (->) D,
e (->) E,
f (->) F,
g (->) G,
h (->) H,
i (->) I,
j (->) J,
k (->) K,
l (->) L,
m (->) M,
n (->) N,
o (->) O,
p (->) P,
q (->) Q,
r (->) R,
s (->) S,
t (->) T,
u (->) U,
v (->) V,
w (->) W,
x (->) X,
y (->) Y,
z (->) Z,
ö (->) Ö,
ü (->) Ü,
ä (->) Ä,
è (->) È,
é (->) É,
ú (->) Ú,
á (->) Á,
â (->) Â,
ê (->) Ê,
î (->) Î,
ô (->) Ô,
û (->) Û,
ß (->) {SS}
];

define Letter [ [ AsciiLetter | ö | ü | ä | è | é | ú | á | â | ê | î | ô | û | ß ] .o. Caseinsensitive ];

define NotSmallCaps [? - a - b - c - d - e - f - g - h - i - j - k - l - m - n - o - p - q - r - s - t - u - v - w - x - y - z - ü - ö - ä - è - é - ú - á - â - ê - î - ô - û];

define BaseWord Char+ ([Apos|Asterisk] Char+)* ([s|S] [%’|%`]);

define Plusampersand @txt"de/plusampersand.txt";

source de/gender.xfst

define CoreWord [Plusampersand | BaseWord] (Dash [Plusampersand | BaseWord])*;
define Word [ CoreWord | CoreWord GenderEndings ];

!  [ Word GenderEndings || WS]  @-> ... NLout,


! Abbreviations and Initials
! The abbreviation list is part of the sentence splitter tool
! of the IDS.
define Abbr [ @txt"de/abbrv.txt" | Letter ] %.;

define HypAbbr [ Abbr ( %- Abbr )+ | {Ba.-Wü.}];

define Streetname Word {str} %.;

source all/allpost.xfst

echo - Compile Real Token

define RealToken [Punct|Emdash|HypAbbr|Streetname|Word|SNS|AcronymDep|Ord|Num|Years|Times|XMLEntities|Omission];

echo - Introduce Token splitter

define Token [
  RealToken @-> ... NLout,
  XML @-> ... NLout,
  URL @-> ... NLout,
  Email @-> ... NLout,
  File @-> ... NLout,
  Domain @-> ... NLout,
  [Emoticons|Arrows|Wikitemplate] @-> ... NLout
];

source all/allsentencesplit.xfst

! foma -e "source tokenizer.xfst" -q -s && cat text.txt | flookup tokenizer.fst -x -b
